Illinois, session 104th, SB1425.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Systems Use in Health Insurance Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Adverse consumer outcome" means a decision by an insurer 8that is subject to insurance regulatory standards enforced by 9the Department that adversely impacts the consumer in a manner 10that violates those standards or any claim denial as 11determined by the use of an AI System. 12    "AI system" means a machine-based system that can, with 13varying levels of autonomy, for a given set of objectives, 14generate outputs such as predictions, recommendations, content 15(such as text, images, videos, or sounds), or other outputs 16influencing decisions made in real or virtual environments. 17    "AI systems program" means a written program for the 18responsible use of AI systems that makes or supports decisions 19related to regulated insurance practices to be developed, 20implemented, and maintained by all insurers authorized to do 21business in the State.22    "Algorithm" means a clearly specified mathematical process 23for computation and a set of rules that, if followed, will give   SB1425- 2 -LRB104 09339 BDA 19397 b1a prescribed result. 2    "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means a branch of 3computer science that uses data processing systems that 4perform functions normally associated with human intelligence, 5such as reasoning, learning, and self-improvement, or the 6capability of a device to perform functions that are normally 7associated with human intelligence, such as reasoning, 8learning, and self-improvement. "Artificial intelligence" or 9"AI" includes machine learning. 10    "Department" means the Department of Insurance. 11    "Machine learning" means a field within artificial 12intelligence that focuses on the ability of computers to learn 13from provided data without being explicitly programmed. 14    "Predictive model" means the processing of historic data 15using algorithms or machine learning to identify patterns and 16predict outcomes that can be used to make decisions or support 17decision-making. 18    "Third party" means an organization other than the insurer 19that provides services, data, or other resources related to 20AI. 21    Section 10. Regulatory oversight of the use of AI systems. 22    (a) The Department's regulatory oversight of insurers 23includes oversight of an insurer's use of AI systems to make or 24support adverse determinations that affect consumers. Any 25insurer authorized to operate in the State is subject to   SB1425- 3 -LRB104 09339 BDA 19397 b1review by the Department in an investigation or market conduct 2action regarding the development, implementation, and use of 3AI systems or predictive models and the outcomes from the use 4of those AI systems or predictive models. The Department may 5also request other information or documentation relevant to an 6investigation or market conduct action, and an insurer must 7comply with that request. The Department's inquiries may 8include, but are not limited to, questions regarding any 9specific model, AI system, or application of a model or AI 10system. The Department may also make requests for information 11and documentation relating to AI systems governance, risk 12management, and use protocols; information and documentation 13relating to the insurer's preacquisition and preutilization 14diligence, monitoring, and auditing of data or AI systems 15developed by a third party; and information and documentation 16relating to implementation and compliance with the insurer's 17AI systems program. 18    (b) An insurer authorized to do business in this State 19shall not issue an adverse consumer outcome with regard to the 20denial, reduction, or termination of insurance plans or 21benefits that result solely from the use or application of any 22AI system or predictive model. Any decision-making process 23concerning the denial, reduction, or termination of insurance 24plans or benefits that results from the use of AI systems or 25predictive models shall be meaningfully reviewed, in 26accordance with review procedures established by Department   SB1425- 4 -LRB104 09339 BDA 19397 b1rules, by an individual with authority to override the AI 2systems and their determinations. 3    Section 15. Disclosure of AI System utilization. The 4Department of Insurance may adopt rules that include standards 5for the full and fair disclosure of an insurer's use of AI 6systems that set forth the manner, content, and required 7disclosures.  8    Section 20. Compliance with Act. All insurers authorized 9to do business in Illinois shall comply with this Act 10regarding any decisions impacting consumers that are made or 11supported by advanced analytical and computational 12technologies, including AI systems and machine learning, and 13must comply with all applicable insurance laws and 14regulations, including laws addressing unfair trade practices 15and unfair discrimination. All decisions made and actions 16taken by authorized insurers using AI systems must comply with 17applicable federal and State laws, regulations, and rules.  18    Section 25. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules, 19including emergency rules, to implement and administer this 20Act. 21    Section 90. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 22amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows:   SB1425- 5 -LRB104 09339 BDA 19397 b1    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)2    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; Artificial 3Intelligence Systems Use in Health Insurance Act. To provide 4for the expeditious and timely implementation of the 5Artificial Intelligence Systems Use in Health Insurance Act, 6emergency rules implementing the Artificial Intelligence 7Systems Use in Health Insurance Act may be adopted in 8accordance with Section 5-45 by the Department of Insurance. 9The adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and 10this Section is deemed to be necessary for the public 11interest, safety, and welfare.12    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 13of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.